Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1518.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin YOUTH AGRICULTURAL TRAINING PROGRAM.new text end new text begin The commissioner of agriculture must establish an agricultural training program for Black youth at historical Black-owned farms in rural Minnesota. The program must offer training in traditional and modern farming practices, sustainable agriculture, entrepreneurship, and community engagement. The program must provide mentorship opportunities to Black youth who are interested in farming. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of agriculture to establish an agricultural training program for Black youth at historical Black-owned farms in rural Minnesota. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end